Washington statutes.
RCW 26.44.060

Immunity from civil or criminal liability—Confidential communications not violated—Actions against state not affected—False report, penalty.

(1)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, any person participating in good faith in the making of a report pursuant to this chapter, testifying as to alleged child abuse or neglect in a judicial proceeding, or otherwise providing information or assistance, including medical evaluations or consultations, in connection with a report, investigation, or legal intervention pursuant to a good faith report of child abuse or neglect shall in so doing be immune from any civil or criminal liability arising out of such reporting or testifying under any law of this state or its political subdivisions.

(b) A person convicted of a violation of subsection (4) of this section shall not be immune from liability under (a) of this subsection.

(2) An administrator of a hospital or similar institution or any physician licensed pursuant to chapters 18.71 or 18.57 RCW taking a child into custody pursuant to RCW 26.44.056 shall not be subject to criminal or civil liability for such taking into custody.

(3) Conduct conforming with the reporting requirements of this chapter shall not be deemed a violation of the confidential communication privilege of RCW 5.60.060 (3) and (4), 18.53.200 and 18.83.110. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as to supersede or abridge remedies provided in chapter 4.92 RCW.

(4) A person who, intentionally and in bad faith, knowingly makes a false report of alleged abuse or neglect shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable in accordance with RCW 9A.20.021.

(5) A person who, in good faith and without gross negligence, cooperates in an investigation arising as a result of a report made pursuant to this chapter, shall not be subject to civil liability arising out of his or her cooperation. This subsection does not apply to a person who caused or allowed the child abuse or neglect to occur.

[ 2020 c 71 s 2; 2007 c 118 s 1; 2004 c 37 s 1; 1997 c 386 s 29; 1988 c 142 s 3; 1982 c 129 s 9; 1975 1st ex.s. c 217 s 6; 1965 c 13 s 6.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective date—1997 c 386: See notes following RCW 13.50.010.

Severability—1982 c 129: See note following RCW 9A.04.080.

Nurse-patient privilege subject to RCW 26.44.060(3): RCW 5.62.030.